
lithicacity.com	
HomeLand of BethlehemThe Other WorldOf LightKingdoms of SunlightA Garden and River - Land of LightMore
The Other World
	 	

	 	

The Other World




Nye Baker










Update

2023-10-25




It is seeming to be the case that where a man is not attempting to be a mother of his children, he is less likely to abuse his children, for the ignorant father is not knowing what he does not have to know, and is actually the right father, a good father, in his ignorance, not knowing what he does not have to know, and not having learned any foolishness from places of ignorance that might lead him to exasperate his children, such as attempting to be a second mother to his children. Of course women sometimes desire a second mother to help them, not always being sure of what is required, and a good father interprets what is actually required, realizing that a son who receives respect from his father, that the son must care for his mother while his father is away, and must be responsible as a child, for being a good child, receiving respect from his father, he is able to be another man of the house, and still his mother's son, still to be mothered by her, while receiving respect from his father, and the treatment of a true father, who might be more likely to neglect his sons, which is actually not offensive to them, despite the railings of those sons who do not desire siblings. In the case of polygamy, of course, there is actually no such thing as half brother or half sister and the word is not a just word, but something that was randomly invented, without knowing what the truth is, and there is no half brother or half sister and the child of a mother is having no siblings who are not born to that mother, and it is a vexation and spiritual wrong to attempt to force something unnatural upon such a child, for it is not a matter of sibling jealousy, but a matter of spiritual limitation for that child and what the truth is, that they have every right to insist that they have no siblings who are not born to their mother, for it is like stretching and abusing such a son or daughter to try to force this false concept upon them. The son who hates his father because of the idea of other siblings, actually has nothing to hate him for, since there are no siblings beyond those of the son's mother, and such is the case with concepts of polygamy, or fear of such, where those who have not known better have forced things that are inappropriate and wrong upon sons and daughters. Also a child should not be cut in half by such concepts, and this is another wrong thing that is to be understood, especially by those who had father's who practised polygamy, such as princes of the king, who might look towards the king's sons and daughters as a type of club, a private school, where these might consider those born of different mothers to actually be brothers and sisters, since there is a house with different wives and all the sons and daughters are aware of this house from the beginning.

	A good father is often neglecting his children, for is not his portion where it is, that it is not the portion of the mother, but his portion is with the portion of the father and the things of a father, that the woman's portion is different than the portion of the man, and not greater or less, but both have equal portions, only they are in different areas and are different things, so that a wise woman seeks her portion, that she receive what is owed to her when she does right things, and a wise man seeks his portion, that he obeys God, and might receive what portion is right for him and its rewards. Now among some people there is the king who is a lion whose wives are hunting and what is his purpose? But if he is a king, than he has his purpose, and the people are still better than the animals, that the sign is still lesser than men and women, who are better. Now this is not the same as a king who is over provinces or nations who receives a tax from his people, and is having a full quiver, that he not commit adultery or be tempted to. Now if any is enraged with rage within them at a man for no reason, that his rage escalates on its own and does not cease, that he attacks, than it is the case that this person is unaware of what their soul should do, for they are to give to this person that the rage, the curse, might leave them, and they must give according to how much they must give for the rage to depart from them, for when they have given what is right for them, then the rage will depart from them. Now these are those who are stalkers, harassers, and the type who continue to be as if angry at a person for no reason, focusing on what they should not focus on, for they are unaware that they are with the sickness of this because they must give to the person until the sickness had left them, for they will know how much they must give until their rage departs from them. Now if a Kami does this to a nation, than the nation must give to the Kami until the sickness is diminished from them. Now that nation that respects the Kami, offering reverence, do they not know of what Kami they give reverence to, that they are part of the ranks of the angels, being the force upon Earth. Now there is a daughter who possesses her husband, and this is a high woman, for she cares for her husband and is good to him, and where he goes, yet she is a man, to be a woman, that she respects her husband and loves him, for in all her getting, she gets her empire, and her husband is part of it, and she gets more, maidens, daughters, riches of spiritual things, and gold and silver is with her, and her spirit takes flight and it is given birth, and it soars, and there is even a special place for her reserved, in the heavens, that she has her husband, who she loves, and she is over many things, that she is not possessed, but is having what is hers, that she is over much in righteousness and good, with her love, and what woman can be her mentor, for she is greater than her mother, only she is still having a mother. Now she is guide to the house of her husband, able to give guidance, and the things of the Lord she is attaining, that the foolishness of Babylon and the world is mocked by her, for there is another world, the other world, and it is eternal, and it is a world of great beauty.

	Now it is the fault of your own people that you have not received the Lord's wisdom, but chosen foolishness in many things, that you cannot blame a slave for their behaviour, for those born to be slaves cannot be otherwise, that you must suffer because of your people and their disobedience, for they have rejected much of the Lord's wisdom, and when your people are ready to accept the Lord's wisdom, then you will be ready to begin. Now when you have begun to obey in one thing, yet you are not obeying all of the Lord's wisdom, for if you do this, that you do not understand all of the Lord's wisdom, then will you not suffer again, and the blameless suffer because of the king, the people, who have not accepted all of the Lord's wisdom. Now those in the family of the father of equality and mercy are a foolish family built on layers of ignorance and deception, for they are made of ignorance and foolishness, and they are a disgusting family. Now the false Josephs are anti-Josephs, that they are envious and they join with their family to throw those they are envious of down a well and they attack in cowardly ways to do evil, for the family that has the false Josephs is such that what does not matter and is nothing is a crime worthy of great hate, as if a great crime, and it is nothing, and the family that has the false Josephs, the brothers and sisters of such, it is likewise in throwing down a well and attacking in cowardly ways to do evil, for the person thrown down a well has done nothing, and they are treated as a great offender, for by wisdom it is nothing, and they are against another for no reason, and they join together in this family and even require no excuse when they need no excuse, for they are the devil's and the false Josephs are the devil's that what is against the Josephs is that which the false Josephs possess, that all that Joseph is not, the false Joseph's are, that they are envious and with bitter envy and great wrath for no reason. Now the devil has invented these and made these, for they are the devil's as well.

	Now there are women who are possessed by their husband, and it is good, and there are women who respect and love their husband, and they possess them, and it is good. Now there is a homosexual who admires and the homosexual who is only a sycophant who hates, and there is the lambs and the goats, that there are Christians who are goats and the angel is not pleased by the goats for they are as insolent enemy soldiers to the angel, having confidence with no substance and disrespect is with them, that they are as those who do not believe or say, it does not matter either way. Now one believer said, you are a great teacher, another, the son of God, and are not both acceptable?

	Now the world was full of projection, and there was terror with those who became enraged, for it was subconscious, that they trembled, for it was the terror of the subconscious, that they were to give to a person or a Kami what they must give to be relieved of the sickness, for they looked upon the Kami and became enraged after a time, that it escalated as it grew, and what a person does in terms of actions that matter to God, is what a person is, according to truth, and not what they do according to their profession, although the profession they do can also be actions before God, that one is a large dragon, who must keep to their domain and not exceed it, for the domain of the large dragon is having its limits according to what they are, and the domain of a man, yet it is abomination for him to do much of what the large dragon does, for he cannot perform it. Now if a person is a thing by actions, which is substance, then they are having what they have rightfully before God, and if a person is a Sufi of any type, that they are having what they have without actions, then what they have is for themselves, that it does not effect another and should not, and yet if any is threatened by substance, they have neither that of a Sufi, for themselves, nor that substance which is by actions, that they are utterly devoid of all substance, whether by the way of the Sufi or by actions, that they are the poor who is wicked who honours himself and lacks bread, for he exalts himself before others, and he is offended by those who have. Now then the substance of the Sufi is honoured before God, and it is for himself or herself, that it does not take priority, for it is contained within itself and those of actions take priority, for they have what has been performed, and the Christ performed on land. Now because the substance of the Sufi does not war with those who have substance by actions, the two are able to be at peace, and the way of the Sufi is able to attain much wisdom and that which also is honoured by God. Now then what are the Pharasees, but they Hebrew devils and Babylon has Pharasees, and they are devils, and the will of the devil these will do, for they are dangerous soldiers. Now not all who perform on land are Judua, for all the tribes perform on land and yet the Sufi is becoming not a Sufi anymore by the performance of much actions on land in ways they are not prior having performed on land, that the addition of more things performed on land eventually they are becoming not a Sufi. Now what is the angel? But he is a performer on land, and a deacon by another type of deacon, and fulfilling deacon of the planet, and the planet, in the way it is, is his domain, and what he can fulfill, he fulfills. Now does not every angel have his jurisdiction, his domain, and the guardian of the jurisdiction is the angel. Now there are angels with different roles and where one does not fear God to a degree that they receive the mark of the beast, yet it is known what this means. Now the Jews fell on their faces and trembled, and there are those who tremble when a leader blasphemes angels, and to give fair warning, for safety, it is not good for you to be forgetting the fear of God in your consideration of angels.

	Now I looked and the devil's people were gathering together under the name INCEL, for they were all of those who had been rejected by society, and they were attempting to take over music and all art and the information people received and the father of equality and mercy was exceedingly righteous in comparison to them, and he was only to be ignored, and yet some of his family had joined the devil's people and they were all of the abject types, all of those who had been rejected by society, every wicked and evil thing, everything that was hidden and everything that was openly known, and they were assembling and carrying out abuse, and they were an army of slaves, and they were for separated men and women, even those who were married, because of their anger at their being rejected by society and because they were slaves and servants, and the devil's people, that they seemed to say, no life shall continue as it was until the Earth is all in our favour. Now it could not be, and they did not seem to know that what they wanted was the destruction of the planet, and it was not an army assembled to do battle, but it was as a cold war, with the enemy dispersed within society. Now their tactics were cowardly and the people had little support, for Adonijeh, the soldiers of cities, was having many who believed in their hearts in what the INCEL were doing, and so it was Solomon and David, the people and the military who were against the Midianites, or the corrupt racketeers and criminals of a corrupt and cowardly type, and against the INCEL, and even against the soldiers of cities, for the soldiers would be able to massacre them all quickly and easily, without losing a man, except even Cessus might have supported Adonijeh, the soldiers of cities, and the people were not given unification and the angel did not know what David did during that time. Now in comparison to David, they were as sport to be killed by David, except the bureaucracy of that time kept David back from fighting, or so the angel believed.




Now the moon is like a person's mother, and it is close to the child, and says, will you not comb your hair? For the moon is close, and it is like the tide. Now the sun is like the father, and it is not as close, and it is good for it to be more distant, less the Earth be scorched and die. Now the sun is not the moon and the moon not the sun, and each has its portion, and it is well that these things are remembered, that a man's true father is not becoming the moon, and the man's true mother is not becoming the sun. Now let none say, but we know it not, for much is justified by the wickedness in these things if they are made wrong. Now what is Saturn? But it is not close, and nor does it give heat the Earth, and nor does it provide life to the Earth, or anything, and is such not like an angel? But an angel is not mother or father, nor brother, nor anything that is providing for a person, and the angel has met some on the road to kill them, that you not be deceived and look to an angel too much when your father is in Heaven and He is able to save you, and His son has done what no angel has done, which is to go out to lay down His life for the sheep, that He has gone further and has the greatest respect and place among the angels, as the Lord's son who has carried out a toughest mission that no angel was able to perform, for He was crucified and killed, and He fulfilled all and came back to life on the third day. Now He made himself lower than the angels to carry out this mission, and He is alive and having attained the ultimate place by His fulfillment. Now say the Lord does not care about substance. But He cares in every way, for He requires substance in all, that none should be having anything in vain, that there be wickedness and injustice, for all pay their dues with the Lord in order to attain. Now those who have the right to kill, must have the right, and it is not being wrong or wicked when they have the right, but for those who do not have the right to something, it is like a prostitute, for she has no right to something, and no right to the man and his time, and the complaints she makes against him, for she is not his wife, and she complains about what is not offensive to the man, or any man, that she robs attention from the wives, for she does not have a right to his attention.

	Now when a tax collector or other person is not able to come to the person the right way, because they desire them, and only because of the circumstance, is there not a mess and some calamity? But it has been so many times with the angel, and Daniels, or Danielles, have saved him, that they save those who do the majority of the fighting, for wisdom is with them to carry this out, and so why will any man consider them to be a fool, to force them to participate in what is beneath them in terms of their wisdom when they are able to be themselves and be free of the evil of Babylon? But wise women know, and are they not more knowing in what is right, that they are less willing to indulge evil with themselves than the man is willing? Now do not insult them, for they are worthy women and they are not foolish, but have wisdom. Now what can a Daniel do while they are in Babylon? But do you think they control Babylon and can wield it? But they are watched closely as well, and it must be understood that those who control are at places unseen and they keep Babylon what it is, that those who would fight Babylon must be able to know where the problem is located. Now beloved, are these women who are Daniels, to the angel, and there are wiser women, even, in other places who attain much in their getting of what is good and good from God, that the Lord gives good to those who have hearts and desire to attain good things, and the devil leads into poverty and ruin to those who desire what is wicked, as a person who gives promises and leads one into a place of destruction for those who abandon God.

	Now when it is complete, yet the palaces of the houses of the Lord are better off, and those in them, exceedingly better off than those drawn away to ruin and destruction and the poverty and ugliness of having been deceived much by the devil. Now was one the greatest fool, or to have the greatest reward? But there was a woman offered the greatest shame and reputation of foolishness and lack of understanding, and the other choice for her was the greatest reward and greatest reputation, that Heaven was offered to her, a great kingdom, or to be an animal crushed in hell and mutilated because of foolishness and lack of understanding, and some said, yet she is the greatest fool, and others, she is blessed. Now those offered much, are falling the furthest and offered the greatest dishonour, and those offered a little, offered a little dishonour if they do wrong. Now is this or any other thing the work of a Buddha, but is it comparable to such? Now has another Christ come? But it is not so, and the Christ performed much and fulfilled much, that they were the Christ. Now is it the sign of Solomon? Yet Solomon is kept to the realm of Jews, and Hebrew Jews, that he was a man. Now by the steps further, there is the abyss, and to go further, is the abyss, and if the abyss is close to the righteous, not many steps further, how much more is it close to the wicked. Now many during this time have gone further than the wicked in their breaking past lines and boundaries, and by the lack of fear of God, some have received the mark of the beast, and they have gone further than the wicked. Now the rebellion of the devil is in the mouth of those in lake of fire, and there are those repulsed by righteousness and good, and much truth they are repulsed by. Now those breaking past all bounds of morality and judgment, and decency, these are in the abyss, that they have gone further than the wicked.

	Now those who have taken the mark of six-hundred and sixty six, are they not as if marked with a disease that is in them, as if drunk in some deep place, that they are taken by the devil? Now it is the number of a man that they have, and it is rebellion, and the mark of the beast, of rebellion against God and lack of fear of God, for it is a human number and a number of a man. Now who receives the mark on their head or on their hand, are not these as if sick and containing a furious enragement within them, that is sycophantic and homicidal, that it burns within them even when they are calm? Now their lies mean nothing and their slanders mean nothing, for they are ignited within by hell, and are a murderous beast of hell when it has happened to them, that they are invalid citizens, their words meaning nothing and not to be trusted, as the words of a beast that is murderous and that is from hell.

	Now let the psychologists be offered the next step, that they have learned and dwelt in learning cognitive ability and that they be offered religion, if they are worthy, for they interpret everything as far as they can go, in terms of Babel, and science, and yet let some of them leave Babel and science, to be given religion of they so desire it, that religion be kept separate from science. Now goats are far from being lambs, and are thought to be philistines of some type, and they seem to have different priorities than belief when they are in the church, for they are believed to be unbelievers who are there for another purpose. Now if there are other types of lambs, some more able to navigate among rocks, and yet they are another type of lamb, for the goats are insolent people, and yet they are often seen to be with wisdom, and yet they do not seem to truly believe, as believers. Now the goats have been enemies of believers. Now the priests of Japeth's people are not these goats. Now if any woman is a voluntary celebit, yet is she not reserved for her husband, and is her husband then a king, that she is reserving herself for the king. Now are not those few who are kings enduring much resistance from the devil in this time? For much is having to be fought for, and yet the people are willing.

	What then qualifies for something is not the same as what does not qualify for something, and there are people who do not qualify for a concept that they speak or that they have in their heart and yet the circumstance is different, and there are those who qualify for something by substance, and yet all that is perceived is the atmosphere and another without substance in a matter is committing foolishness and they do not qualify for some action, or some words, and indeed it is another contention that is occurring, and yet when it is only support spoken privately, will any be offended? Now the support of one is not as the deceptive support of another and what is not making one an offender but seems to be an offender is a matter of different substance that is not commonly known and understood. Now there are those claiming they are not an offender, against the morality, and they claim so with what they do not qualify for according to the circumstance, that it is foolishness.

	Now there is another matter, of kings, where a person very wise is becoming as an unintelligent fool when he attempts to be a king, and yet it was a wise man or wise woman, and they were exceedingly wise and yet when they attempted to be a king they were as an unintelligent fool of much foolishness, and yet him who was chaotic a little and was seeming more foolish, was brave and righteous and they judged with fairness and did not loose their integrity and their understanding was impeccable, and they were capable to handle the war against them. Now neither did their kindness fail, but it remained, and they were far better to be a king than the man or woman known for wisdom, who were exceedingly wise. Now it is then known, yet Solomon was a lion of a type, and yet it did not seem so, and yet he was not of Judua.

	Now what is a thing is not offensive in a thing, when it is consistent, that the thing is open at the start and known, and it becomes as its actions that if it is good, it has a place, and the portion for it is what it has, and what is another thing and having a great place with God, yet it is punished more severely in the departure from it, for it casts away its place and its reward and neither of these things should be cast away for those who have given a great thing with God. Now for those given an unjust thing by God, yet in throwing it away, what is it? But the thing that was given was unjust. Now to those not worthy of what they were given, that they cast it away, yet it is only a consequence, that they rebel and become hostile and reckless, because they are not worthy of a thing. Now the one sold into injustice is not sold in truth, honestly, that what error do they commit in relieving themselves of what was a trick? But if you will judge like an angel, are you an angel? But if you will judge like an angel, are you seeking real truth in all the things you consider? Now despite the foolishness in the world, yet do not people know what is acceptable and what is not according to what is acceptable and what their deeds have been? But if you will rather have foolishness as your king, to judge you right or wrong, than you make your decision. Now is not the reward greater for those who have been given the greater place with God, and yet they must keep to what they have been, that there is no offence for the one who is what they are from the beginning, and they have what they have, and it is a lesser portion for them, because their place is not as great with God, and yet they are still having a good portion. Now it is not the place of every woman to have a mentor, a woman who is as a mother, for they have a different reward, and it is not beneficial for getting a better reward to place foolishness as king and god over yourself to judge right and wrong, that you give up on truth and the Lord, to abandon the Lord and truth for the foolishness of this world to be your judge. Now then I would say, do not abandon the Lord and truth for the foolishness of this world, for there are other worlds and not all are having God as their king and yet God is owner of the Universe, and with Him there is wisdom, and He is all wise. Now the foolishness of this world as judge has no power to make your actions or words right or wrong, and nor can the foolishness make wise any foolishness and what the truth will be for you, in reality that is perceived by those with good understanding, that those who keep to truth when they are women, are also those keeping to wisdom if they are those who seek wisdom. Now why is that some men are sometimes deceived in these things? Now when you hear the judgment of slaves, do not regard it, for if you hear the insanity, and the insanity of their ways, yet they are not able to become more than themselves. Now if poor virgins desecrate with their mouths, yet it is not a thing to be regarded but thrown away as foolishness. Now if the insanity of animals is so great, than there is open war upon your husband, and is it not a cowardly war? Now those women who will be with the man who is rich, he is not rich by Midianites, or by Babylon, or by the foolishness of this world, but he is rich in Zion and then you are able to make him rich, you wives, and the woman of understanding is as one strong in faith. Now speak not things and words of slaves who have morality of animals, and worse than animals, but regard not slaves and all animals, who are lost and insane in their chaos. Now there is a woman who likes no game or sport mixed with love from the man who is interested in her, and the woman who does, and both women are faithful and with integrity, that they have a statue. Now a concubine is not a wife and a wife not a concubine, and if the concubines are having no firm attachment, then even if there is love, they are free to go, and there is no evil in it, for all is in honesty. Now where there is not honesty, there is betrayal, and I looked, and it was a fiction, a false belief, and those who made fictions showed this false thing and did not give it with understanding, for that which betrayed never was, and that which is, is always.

	Now give not heed to the judgments of animals, for they have the understanding of what is not in their mouths and the morality of animals, and they delight in wickedness and foolishness, for they are the poor, the virgins, the lacking, and they are out in utter darkness, a place of gnashing teeth and misery within that is not known of.

	Now the palace has light and lamps, and the wall is high and the house of the palace is as a remnant against the corrupted world outside where there is ignorance and utter darkness. Now then come, you are wives, who are setting yourself aside, and the good, those as if persecuted by evil, the palace is wanting to aid you, that you be saved, for ignorance has fallen on the land, and the cruel ways of evil men and women, and the things of hell are in the land and a disease has taken the minds of most, and others are eager to do evil, that they have the anarchy that they have wanted. Now if the pillars of the Lord's house remain, yet what has become of the rest of The Temple? But I seek to build in Mala, in Heaven and on Earth, and as for the physical sign, I am not interested in moving one stone into place, for The Temple is upon all the Earth, and it moves across the land. Now do not the priests of Japeth's people fight Sodom and Egypt and Sodom as well, that they hate both these things? Now are they not also in keeping with the truth of the scripture, to be priests of Japeth's people? But why do you prefer the foolishness of this world to be the judge of right and wrong? Now white supremacy is only a name, and if too blunt, yet it is only for Japeth's people, and it is against abuse, and is in keeping with the truth of the scriptures. Now as the for sign, The Temple in Israel, the physical nation of Israel, are not Japeth's descendants able to rebuild it if there is no problem from the Muslims? But if The Temple is not complete outside The Temple, than how will it be completed and built as the sign of The Temple? But if the lost tribes are not there, than how will it be built? Now do not say the other child of God, his inheritance, is illegitimate, and not really his other child, and neither say it indirectly, that there might be peace possible. Now do not judge with the foolishness of this world, choosing instead its folly to be the judge of right and wrong, that you might be considered Jews in eyes of Salem's Jews and the world, if you are a Hebrew Jew and wishing for peace with what has been written here and in other books, and with those who are also Jews, not even by their own planning, and all the people who believe in God. Now has not God created the Heavens and Earth, and yet you find it impossible that the whole Earth should be His people, when they believe in Him? But a suicide mission was carried out by Elijah and the Christ, and by it the whole of the Earth is filled up with Jews and people who believe in God.

	Now Babylon was cleared and the priest of Babylon were gone, for the time of it had seemed to pass, and they were only the tax collectors who were doing good for others while dealing with much stress, and they were good and doing good and the Daniels had remained, for there were men and women who were Daniels, who were the priests of the fortress, and they were doing good for many who were not understanding the reason for things, that they were saved from what they could not see and know, and yet those who were traitors to good were few, and not the majority of the priests, and the goats were evil, and insolent, and philistines, a type of people, a type of gentile, they were evil, and yet the number of goats and philistines among the priests was few and those who were Daniels had seemed to increase and the animals were plenty, and most of Babylon was gone, and a Daniel had saved an angel and yet the goats sought to use it for evil, for the goats were against all of God's people, whoever they happened to be.

	Now some have believed these types to be sociopaths, for they are uncertain of what they are, and yet these are the goats who are in the church and offended by those who please God, who even Shepard the sheep and false Shepard. Now there are a type of sheep that is identified as goats and yet they are sheep. Now the sheep are believers and yet what of the goats? Now what business do the priests of Japeth's descendants have coming into the church where there are the other priests, and the holy priest-hood of Earth, that is the Christians, chosen as a special people for the Lord, that the priest-hood of Japeth's descendants might not say they are not believers when they do not believe? But if any is a priest of Japeth's descendants and they are a believer, yet they are part of the church as a believer, but they are not attending and part of it for the purpose of being a priest of Japeth's people, which is another role. Now the whole of the Bible is to be accepted and the Story of Noah and his sons, which is the cause of the priest-hood of Japeth being good and being acceptable in what they are acceptable. Now I cannot deny God's word and neither can any who accepts Christianity, and there are many types of Christians, and there are even the mountains, or stones, who are walls and roads, that they too are Christians. Now the stones are not as the rocks of below the Earth, the shelves of Orgoth, where those who are slaves are, for they are gods, the slaves, and though the stones are not beneficial for all things and are seeming as if stubborn in some things, yet the stones are gathered for walls that defend the people, and roads, and they have been called conservatives often, and not all conservatives are mountains and stones, and the liberals as soft soil, and yet not all liberals are soft soil for planting.

	Now the whole of all the scriptures written that are not to be added to the Bible, are given to Nathan Unsworth, being the businessman who is given ownership of all the scriptures that he is given The Diary of Lucifer and Notes from Salem and this book as well, that they are his entirely, him being an artist and businessman entrusted with these things, that he did not pay for them but was given them freely, than this is a man who is polish in ethnicity, being entirely polish, who is given all the scriptures of the Emperor of Salem, who is the angel, and all the scriptures of the angel. Now the businessman's name is Nathan Brian Barrie Unsworth, born in Edmonton, Alberta, student of Humber College, citizen of Canada, son of an Unsworth and Barrie, student of Cayuga Secondary School, resident of Hannah, Selkirk, Haldimand-Norfolk, Calgary, Toronto, and Hamilton all in Ontario except for Calgary and Hannah, Alberta. Now the prior is the order of his residences, that he was a child in Hannah, and moved to Ontario at approximately the age of five. His email address is unsworthnathan@gmail.com. He does not support or condone nor condemn any of the writings in The Diary of Lucifer, Notes from Salem, or this book called The Other World.

Now the Emporer has no power and is so by mala, that it is not an official thing, and the Shoguns are mentioned in The Diary of Lucifer. Now the angel is having the name Nye Baker as Emporer and Lucifer as angel.

	Now does America need anything to be mentioned about them in prophecy? But I do not know, only that they are allies of Salem, or Canada, the fast moving and reckless river, a place with holy stones. Now the Emperor does not acknowledge the monarchy that is associated with Canada, and he only acknowledges Canada and its Shoguns that a further description is offered in The Diary of Lucifer. Now the Shoguns are David, the military, Adonijeh, the soldiers of cities, and Solomon, the citizens, who are king, and David, the military, is the higher king. Now among the citizens combined, all of the citizens, is the wisdom that makes up Solomon for Canada, when it is combined, and there is already wisdom with the people. Now Cessus has citizens and a person of the military is over them, that it is right. Now Prince Rellium, he is a prince of Salem, and yet much of his work is only policing and not being the Prince Rellium of Salem.

	Now what is this family of the devil's Jews that judges as if very great wrong for what is nothing, that they might even go so far as killing, and the tribe even has its devil Joseph, the devil's version, and they are perceived to be one of the people? But they are not one of the people, and are harassing and evil fickle-girls, concealing their great hate and they even conceal that they are very homicidal. Now all of the hate and the murder is concealed, that none can see it, and they are seeming as if one of the people, and yet they are perverted in their judgments, and judging that people should die because of envy and jealousy. Now have they not turned upon the brave many times to slay them guile and to drive them into prison and into death even, if they are able? Now learn not their ways and do not attempt their ways and the things they do, for evil men will obey their word easily, and evil women likewise, but for a good person they will not listen to you even if you have cause to attempt their ways and methods, for they are not one of the people because men and women obey their words easily and do their will over what is nothing, as if it was great wrong. But they are not one of the people and yet the devil gives them success in their evil, and good people are having cause and many good are treated like bastards, that none will listen to their words when they have cause, and yet they are not bastards and they are one of the people. Now the angel is a bastard and so is the Emperor, and earnestly so, for I do not write of only Mala. Now in lands and places where the good are having success when they have cause, are these not good lands, and is it not evidence of good places where there is integrity?

	Now there is no need for concepts like abilism or anything else of this nature, and there are human beings and cognitive impairments that are from psychological problems, and abilism is a term and idea that might only lead to injustice and evil whether people are against it or for it.

	Now this book and The Diary of Lucifer is able to lend other books that are smaller collections of concepts found for business people who do not have time to consider some things on their own that are required in the world of business due to the hostile nature of business that some things of wisdom are required in addition to business skills in order to operate in the business world. Also the military might have use of these books, as well as any person who does not have time to consider the things that might be offered.

	Now for those who have enemies as the military does, where distractions are used in combat to lessen a person's attention to what they are doing so that their fighting ability might be lessened, it is seeming better than for a man or woman not to be married or to be in love with anyone, and so strangely I have devoted much attention to these types of things, for the wellness of the people that they not be slayed with guile in these ways, and also for the wellness of soldiers that they not be distracted in what they have to do. Now there is a correct time and place for almost anything to be said, and yet when things are said in the incorrect time and place, it is a cognitive impairment and incoherent. Now the things that are wicked that might be yelled in combat are sometimes things that slay with guile a little, and the actions of these things slay with guile, and as such these things also distract and can lessen a person's fighting ability. Now is any soldier's wife hating him that she would insult herself so greatly and degrade herself so greatly as to sleep with a soldier of the enemy, that she is filled with hate for him and her own people and country, for it would be a woman of great hatred and wickedness, and if not that, then a prostitute of the enemy, which does hate the people. Now this would be insulting and degrading herself greatly and it would be a great act of much hatred and wickedness for her that she would have to slay herself with iniquity and hate. Now if not, then she would be a prostitute of the enemy, who would not slay herself with this, and if she is so, than you cannot possibly love her to begin with, for such is not a woman. Now does any man rub his own refuse on himself? But this would not insult himself one tenth as greatly. Now with wisdom and understanding the perception is made better, and so take the perceptive ability of an angel, who is mightier than you in these things.

	Now that which a man might be able to fall in love with is a woman, and that which is loved is a type of woman who is not a wife, that to be in love is much greater than to love. Now the women who are loved are becoming divorced and it is better that they are never married, for a wife must have a husband who is in love with her, and she who is in love is able to be in love with, that this is a wife not married yet or married, for a man can be in love with her and she can be in love with a man. Now that which loves is a woman of another type, and she is loved, and it is better that she is not married if her husband is not with love her and she is not in love with her husband, for love is not enough for marriage and to be in love is marriage by mala, that as it is in Heaven so it should be on Earth. Now let it be compared to an angel. But as this person is higher in a way so they have all the abilities of this to be a wife and those who are openly kind and loving and one of the people, being a woman, yet she may be in love at a later time, and it is a thing of Mala, that it has happened. Now it is the prostitute of the enemy who is the wicked by what they are, and the woman who slays with guile by intentionally seducing that she might betray him, this is another prostitute of the enemy, for she has planned that she intends to betray him that she seduces him. Now these are two different prostitutes of the enemy and neither are women, and neither are one of the people, but they are enemies of the people. Now the enemy rejoices as if praising animal nihilism, but the people do not rejoice, who are one of the people.

	Now as for mountains and rocks found in rocky lands, there are different types of rock shapes that have different names and different attributes, and Salem, or Canada, has many types of mountains and rocks and they are, in my opinion, the best mountains and rocks in the world, and we have many, and I will say they are better than European Mountains, but perhaps there is a personal bias of mine, for these mountains are defending the people, and I do not like that their weapons, that are for hunting or recreation, should be taken away from them, for they are mountain people, and they are not soft soil, and people of the cities where it is less seemly to own a weapon or to have a weapon, unless there is crime taking place. But I am not Shogun of the people, only the weapons are part of the culture of mountain people, who are more plentiful in rural areas, and it is an uncomfortable thing for them to register their weapons, but let them not be taken away from them. Now it is not an uncomfortable thing to register weapons for those who are soft soil and people of soft soil, so that you understand that different groups are very different in what concerns them and what is an offence to them, and all are the people and all support each other in their existence. Now mountain people are more concerned for being free, for they are defending the people, these mountains, that freedoms of the people are of great concern to them, and the soft soil is often not as concerned with such things, for the wisdom of the mountains knows that the people's freedoms must be protected and defended. Now those who say they are rebellious, yet they are the opposite of rebellious, for they are defending the people in their concern for freedoms of the people, and though rock formations are frightening, yet they are the people's rock formations.

	Now mighty men, elite soldiers, have come from these mountain people, to join David, and is not David then having a covenant in a way with the mountains? Now there are great mountains, that are concerned for the people, caring about their freedoms, defending them and fighting for them, and these are your kings, Salem, or Canada, that you regard them, for they are as the mountains, some believing them conservatives, for they are not as soft soil in some things, and being great, they are great kings and they are having strength and does God not respect their mouths and their opinions, paying attention to their grievances? But I do not know, only that the people should not be blind, for many of the people are almost entirely blind, and a greater king than these came to Earth and it was God's son. Now I looked and Salem had too many vultures of a large type, that are very aggressive and mean, who do not prey upon the dead but swoop in on the injured, when they are only slightly injured, or worse, and they swoop in on the elderly and are stubborn to fly away in retreat so that the young men who beat them away, must fight aggressively with them to drive them off, and because of the blindness of the soldiers of cities and their ignorance, the young men must not use death threats, and would the vultures even listen? But these vultures are very aggressive and large and once they have swooped in, the young who contend with them are heroes to drive them off, and some of the vultures flee and are cowards and they bring the soldiers of cities against the young men who drove them away when they were pecking at the slightly injured or elderly, tearing them to pieces, that the soldiers of cities, in their blindness and injustice, are then lecturing the young men, partnering with the evil animals that peck and tear apart the slightly injured or the elderly. Now this foolishness is an unjust abomination, for the soldiers of cities must not be this foolish any longer, and if any soldier of the city is blind in this way they should not be permitted to be an soldier of the city any more, for their blindness makes them disabled to do their job properly. Now the blindness is such a blindness that it is upon many of the people, and the person must be able to see in all things, clearly, without blindness or bad vision, if they are to be a soldier of the city, or a judge of the people.

	Now should you not praise the young men who drive vultures away from pecking and tearing apart the slightly injured? But the young men are called sociopaths who are strong, who are good, or who are Judua, and such is the bad and wrong judgments of Adonijeh, that those young men who do good things that are selfless are called sociopaths in Salem, or Canada, and this must cease, for it is wickedness and ignorance and it is an impairment to our people. Now is not Adonijeh then not equal to Solomon? But he is equal and yet Solomon, or the people, are made king, anointed by mala and truth, that it is in Heaven. Now only David is the higher king, being the highest king.

	Now there were many of these evil vultures in Canada that preyed upon the sick, pecking them and tearing them to pieces, and it was not as vultures who might come when one is dead, no longer in their body. Now there was another thing, those who judge that all people are having faults and sin, that only the animals, of Ria, and not Mala, but the literal animals, should be left to live and it is their judgment that all pleasure and life and people are worthy of death and must be wiped out, that only the animals are blameless to them, for God sent a flood, and the devil sends his own flood by these servants of him, that only the animals should live. Now if the Lord says, some must die, than the devil says all must die except for the animals. Now is this not part of the war that is ongoing between Heaven and Hell, that it is a war of an eye for an eye, and the devil seeks to match and Heaven seeks revenge. Now if the Lord has offered a prophet, the devil offers a false prophet, and if the Lord has given a Joseph, the devil, a false Joseph of the devil's, now if God has given a flood, than the devil, a flood against the Lord and the people who please Him.

	Now a slave wages war in the Temple, in the realm of the sacred, being brutal and wicked there, blaspheming with things that are not part of war, speaking brutality that seems violent due to its brutality in sacred areas as if not understanding and not knowing what is taking place, for brutal is the slave, and they are gods, not worth effort or time, for they cannot be other than they are. Now who puts the words the slaves in the mouths of women, that they should be ugly and sin against themselves, against their own blessing and wisdom for them, that they should inherit, that the words of slaves should be put in the mouths of holy women by slaves? But even if they are not slaves, they have been lead astray to their own hurt and folly, that they are still able to be recompensed for the iniquity of their mouths, that they allowed themselves to be lead astray by slaves. Now for men and women, do not learn the ways of slaves and the iniquity of them, for slaves do not perceive and they are below the Earth, on the shelves of Orgoth, the devil's people, slaves to you. But you women, do not be lead astray by slaves who know they give you foolish advice and foolish things to to say, that they know they are attempting to lead you astray. Now you know the truth, and it is as one who drops their weapons, and their shield and allows themselves to be slain, for their advice is harassment, and it is as bullying to the one who is injured by a thing, and where is the wise comforter for her, the wise woman who comforts with wisdom and words of good and good advice, to maintain integrity, to be offered understanding? But that which hates the woman leads her astray. Now the one who sought the things of mala, who kept integrity, yet this man was given all the things that the wicked sought and were not able to attain, and he was given these things after he had restrained himself, and the wicked went ahead without integrity and did not attain and later the one who restrained themselves was given all the things they sought, and he was given these things by God. Now the angel, it is seeming, that the Lord said to him, I will give you anything, all riches, anything you desire, every whim that comes to you, I will give to you and without delay, and yet there is one thing I will not give you. I will not give you much money, and yet all the things they seek with money I will you give you in great abundance. I will make you as a king if you desire it, and yet without money, and I will make you as wealthy businessman, and yet without money, and anything you desire, I will give you without much delay, except I will not give you money, and if money is pursued, I will remove the riches I give, and if money is abandoned as a pursuit, I will give you the riches I give, that they attempt to gain with money. Now He seemed to have made the angel like a prince among those of Judua, among strong people of action, and yet the angel was not fully Judua, but was more as if a son of David, for the angel was not as strong and of action as Judua. And it was as if the angel had many wives, more than David, and yet the angel had little in money. And the angel had help from Heaven and comfort and encouragement from Heaven, and every way he turned, it seemed as if He pleased God, and the angel wrote hundreds of songs during this time and indulged in romantic love. Now after this had left the angel said, I will follow the wisdom of practical people a little, and the angel pursued money, and the land became desolate and empty and the abundance of it dried up, for the angel did not keep integrity to remain with the things of God, but pursued money, to follow the wisdom of practical people, and it was as if a desert without water for the angel, and he wandered and was bitten by scorpions, and it also seemed as if Jeroboam had been made king during this time, and it was not good, and the angel detested Jeroboam and his ways. Now evil birds pecked him having swooped in from the sky, and they harassed him, and the desert was dry and without water, and it was a time of dry wind in the day and during the night. Now the angel perceived, the Lord cares greatly for one of these women who departed, and it pleased him, at least, that the Lord cared for her and that revenge would be upon him for this reason, except for the other reasons he was not pleased with the revenge. Now for this, he considered, I deserve revenge upon me, and yet for the other things he detested the revenge. Now he only wrote a few songs in times of greater peace while he was in the desert, and he wandered there for over a year and then there was a plague during that time, and after wandering in the desert, a cowardly siege was placed against his residence, and he was not able to kill a single man because of the cowardice, and then he was given the time of offering wisdom after the siege, and the comet was between Saturn and Jupiter and Jupiter was larger than Saturn, for the words, the angel considered, should not be condensed, so that understanding not be lost.

	Now of the foolishness facing business people, and even some citizens, he offered what the truth was, that we are all guilty, we people, by the standard of people, for they were criminally harassing people as methods of war in business. Now this was an easy thing of a man to consider, and yet some did not have time to consider, for they were very busy.

	Now servants were doing pointless and empty things, and things only servants would do, because they were so pointless and empty, that they attempted the impossible and injustice and demanded to be put more forcefully in their place. Now looking at it though, it was not necessary to do anything, for it was pointless and an empty thing of no consequence, and more was not needed, and it was a thing to be ignored. Now there were others who performed difficult things and their attempts at injustice were pointless and empty and it was not worth even doing more than rebuking them occasionally, and nothing was required, for it, too, was a thing of no consequence. Now that which is high needs no attempt to dominate, but what is high is not trying to dominate, for to be high there is not ability to attempt, for what is beneath is beneath and the act of attempting to dominate touches only air and nothing, that it is not within the high. Now what was low had the attempts to do so, for when something was low, it was capable, and it was as the falling before the high. Now a slave hears no words or any type of evil speech, or any servant taming, but the slave only hears the chain and the iron stick for beating, and they are gods. Now it was injustice that anything lower should be punishing anything higher, for what they called justice was evil, and not justice, and they did not judge, but offered evil that they thought was justice. Now that which judges is higher, and yet the wicked and unjust judge was injuring themselves to condemn the righteous and what was higher. Now what is higher is fair and good to what is lower, and what is lower is not capable of judging what is higher. Now the exception is that small children, not yet five years of age, are the only worthy to judge angels without blasphemy, and do they not bring guilt to some angels?

	Now who knows what the domain of an angel is? But it is a thing not concerning people, for angels know and answer to the Lord. Now who knows what each angel's way of life is? But the angel will know what their way of life is, and they answer to the Lord. Now if some angels are doing one thing, and are angels for one thing, and other angels, for another thing, that another thing is theirs, still it is a thing not concerning people, and angels answer to the Lord. Now rebellion is found with some people towards angels, and it is in their mouths as speaking of what an angel's domain is, or what their obedience to God is, and people cannot know it, and nor do angels answer to people, and must carry out their tasks as best as they can. Now an angel does not give advice even to another angel, and so how much more blasphemous for people to question? But if any are receiving the number six-hundred and sixty-six on their head and hand, is there not an angel present somewhere that they rebel against do evil towards? Now you are advised to be fearing God, but the angel moves to being Emperor, and the number will not be given if it is so, for to be Emperor is a lower thing than an angel, a thing of the Island nation, and yet still higher, if it is the thing of the Island nation, than a king or leader of a nation. Now those who have received the number of the beast, these are as if possessed by the devil, and though the sickness of it seems to pass, the murderous possession, still it is in them, and it can return.

	Now a Japanese thing is required and they are a people concerned with angels and the Emperor acknowledges the holy stones in a crown, the holy stones of Canada, and those below the Earth, how are these Canadians? Now if there are those of the dark shade who are not as enemies to the fair shade, desiring that there should be an acknowledgement of being enemies, as if a war ongoing, for there have been many of the dark shade who have more hated the compassion that is as perversity and belittlement of them from the fair shade, that it is intolerable to them, and as if passive-aggressive belittlement and bullying, that they bully to be hated, that the bullying might cease, and yet do not say what they do not like, that it is exchanging evil for good, and yet still if there are those not wanting to be enemies, loving the fair shade, being of integrity towards them, how are these to be counted with those it is good for to be having their own place of residence on Earth? But people are able to judge rightly considering this thing. Now these of the dark shade are not as bastards, and they are of truth, keeping to God, and they are of integrity of Jews, of Salem Jews, and they behave towards the fair shade as the fair shade behaves towards the fair shade, and not striving to be impious. Now though the priest-hood of Japeth's descendants are being against him, or are assumed to be, yet do you not support him or her who is with you, that they are with God and with your people? Now this is from the Emporer, Nye Baker, and how will the priest-hood be offended by this thing, because it is well that these are not enemies of the fair shade. Now do not create discord and laud a person over a bastard of the fair shade, for the bastard of the fair shade is your bastard, you who are fair, and understanding more, and it is good that you are having every member of your people and every type of your people, for each has a support for you.

	Now Eretz Chadrach I call Salem, and Salem is older than Israel, and so is Damascus, and Eretz Chadrach, Canada, or Salem, is that which the Emperor, Nye Baker, is concerned with, and those things that are below the Earth, these things the Emperor has known are not the people, for the people are stones in a crown, and they are Salem people, and as for those people who are wicked and evil, these people the Emperor is not concerned with. Now it is understood that what is lower, exceedingly, will be impious to what is great and find excuse to be impious when there is not offence by contention with that person. Now contend not with anyone, do not bully, when there is no cause from that person against you.

Now the Hebrew Jews I have not hated, and in The Diary of Lucifer I offered a rebuke that only applied to some of them, that it might be offered, that there might be peace, for there were fools who were Jews who were jealous and the thing was required to be mentioned, and yet it was not to say that the Hebrew Jews are evil or that they, all of them, are a jealous people. Now am I only a gentile, or a person of another people, that you would reject my words as that of an enemy? But there is no room for me to be against the Hebrew Jews, because of the daughters of them, and also there is no room, because the other tribes were removed and there is confusion, that I am not able to judge the Hebrew Jews. Now then do you not also bring forth the other tribes that were lost, when things are right? Now I do not know if you have Judua among you, but he is a person of action, and is it not even more so than those of David that Judua is a person of action?

	Now there are indeed those among you who have eaten swine and are filled up with it, and are there not also prostitutes of the enemy among you? Now this is not clean, and it is also so of other people groups, that they are having unclean things among them, and Salem, too, is having these things. Now the father of equality and mercy has spread his ideology across most of the Earth and yet his own people do not follow him, most of them. Now I am not familiar with your people and cannot offer anything more unless I was to dwell among you, and I have desired for there to be peace by way of justice and acknowledgements that there might be peace, for the truth is actually acceptable to all, and it is only offence to the wicked when it is written. Now is any who rebuke you an angel? But is any Emperor, in the fashion of the Island nation? But I am able to say things that it is not the place of others to say, and God is able to say things that it is not the place of others to say. Now why will any rather have the foolish judge of another people's ideology as their judge of morality and their god, rather than the Lord? But the people it comes from do not adhere to this judge either, and most of them are preferring truth.	 Now if there is one judging themselves by the moral standard of Egypt, will you despise them? But if they hate some things that you do not hate, will you hate them for what they are? Now they are not bastards, and the morality of Egypt is taught more than the truth in many places. Now the father of equality and mercy, does he, too, not prefer the morality of Egypt, and yet people have the truth, and the truth is identified and discovered and not randomly invented.




Now it is not the man's responsibility to know if a woman is married that he look away from her, or assume she is not married, and it is a woman who does not look at him, or ignores him, that she is receiving honour and respect, for the man does not know if she is married or not, if he cannot clearly see a token of marriage on her. Now it is only a small portion of the young women, who are not being women, who are not understanding what occurs in the world, and why will any man marry one of these? But it is a spiritual man, like Jacob, who is protecting the feelings of the wife of his youth, that you not be stubborn with iniquity, to have no care or concern for her feelings, for such is as violence to such a woman who loves you, that you not care for her feelings. Now what woman is comparable to her? But she is not always found in youth. Now if you are caring not for her feelings, is the Lord not with her, on her side, caring for her cause? Now the angel, also, might be guilty of some of this, and the Lord, the angel perceives, has not even spared an angel in this thing, but has offered revenge towards him. Now the angel was made like an exile, to wander the desert where there was no water, to be stung by scorpions, and pecked by evil birds that swooped down, and even later, there was a siege of cowards against him, and he was not able to kill a single man because of the cowardice used. Now the Lord does not support adultery as a means of revenge, for it is then not revenge. But adultery as revenge, called falsely, is partnering against God, to do war against God, that He is the Lord, and He is able to take revenge for you, whether people are honest or not about the revenge that is taken. Now adultery as revenge is against oneself, as one who cuts their face with a knife and cuts off their hands and hangs themselves over a pool of water to take revenge, that they kill themselves as revenge, and not to justice, but to their condemnation, that the one they would take revenge upon is justified and no longer guilty, but held to be good, to then be known to be the good one all the time, even in the wrong they did, that all their wrong is made right, and righteous, as if doing justice against an enemy, and the one they wrong has killed themselves and lashed out against God, that they are condemned. Now it is wicked and foolish, and the Lord is able to take revenge, and will not the Lord be with the woman who is wronged? But why will any show themselves not having ever been worthy of taking revenge for by partnering with the devil, to do the will of the devil, and more so against themselves than against God and any man? Now the Lord is the father of His children and both the man and woman are His children, and He is diligent and able to take revenge and to punish, and He cares for both the man and woman, His sons and daughters. Now put not the words of slaves in your mouths, you women, though you are seeking justice, and will you not be as a Jew, as a daughter of Sarah? Now will the Lord be on your side, if you are not with understanding and love to be a daughter of Sarah, or a woman as Sarah? But she is a holy woman, and you women are called to be holy woman, who are as a great and priceless thing to find for a man, more desirable to have than all of the daughters. Now how will I describe it? But there was a woman who had a statue that was beautiful and had Eagles that flew and did her good work, and she was holy and prudent, desiring, like Jacob, the better things, the rewards of God, and some of them had maidens and great houses and special places in Heaven, and they were princesses and queens, their beauty preserved in Heaven. Now a foreign woman to them was a prostitute of the enemy against her husband, against her people, and a wandering and worthless thing to them. Now this was not a thing of the sons of Noah by which she has judged. Now the daughters of the people have understanding, and are with truth, wanting good things, that you not believe the slanders of the misogynist, who is slandering women to say they do not care for God or the people, or morality, when they are even caring more sometimes than the men of that nation, or when the misogynist is saying, they do not care about adultery or slander, when they care more than the men, sometimes, of the nation, and they are with excellent understanding, knowing before the man and protecting him, speaking to him with warning, and it is not jealousy, defending him, and it is not blocking love. Now yet the wife of him, she is pure, and may pass by them without regard.

	Now the slanders of the misogynist say that women do not care about justice, that they do not care about the people, that they do not care about their brother, that they do not care about morality and justice and God, and every right thing that they care about more than men, depending on the season of the society, whether they care more than men or it is good they are caring more than men at some times, women during seasons being pillars of the Temple that keep the people, the Temple, that keep the roof of the Temple where it should be, that the Temple does not collapse and the people stumble much, or utterly fall and anarchy happen. Now what woman is warring against the prostitute of the enemy? Now the woman who is good, who has wisdom, who cares for the Lord, and cares for the people, she has been insulted in your belief about her, that she is not caring for these things, and does she not understand men, and how to support her house, how to build it up? But if many things of men are still a mystery to her, yet she knows and understands how to build up and what is good by the Lord. Now hateful men have written fictions, hating the righteous man, dealing out judgement in fictions that are wicked and supportive of the devil, for he does not care for justice, but cares for his own hate towards righteous men, and the hate is great, and this is a servant's heart of service to the devil, being a heart of a devil's servant in the great hate, that the great hate is this type of heart and the heart becomes a servant of the devil in heart, and there is another man who exploits the non-existent cause of the woman, that the cause exists falsely, and yet he exploits it in contention against the righteous men, being against the women and yet saying, it is because I am for the women and defend them, and in defending them, he is against the women, all the good women and their integrity, to be against the righteous men, for he is angry at the righteous men, and is it not often the case that he is angry at the righteous men without a reason? But he is of the father of equality and mercy, and he does not truly care about equality or mercy only the name is the deceit of his spirit. Now I looked and there were all the of those who sowed discord between the women and men, the good women, and the men, and they were as brothers and sisters, and their father was the devil, and the prostitute of the enemy was their sister, and they worked together, for they were not divided against each other, but their hearts, as if their souls, knew their brothers and sisters by only hearing mention of their deeds, and they were not against their brothers and sisters, but even hearing about the work of their brothers or sisters, without knowing them, but recognizing them by their works, their hearts knew that one was describing their brothers and sisters and they were not against their brothers or sisters, but supported them, and would partner in what they were doing, instantly aiding them upon hearing of them, so that it is prudent not to go to any of the children of the devil for help, for the house of the devil is not divided against itself. Now I looked again, and there were even more, a great multitute of the people of the devil, and they were the families spread out of the devil, and many different groups of the devil, and I could not name all of them, and the truth was too big for me again, and yet none of those of the devil's were against each other, but they all knew the devil's people easily, with only hearing about their deeds, and they were supporting each other and partnering in their evil and continuing their evil more if any of them should hear about those of the devil and what they were doing. Now they were like a gang, and yet they were not so, for they had no affiliation and required no instruction, but their hearts made them united and their hearts belonged to the devil and the devil's house was not divided against itself. Now let the angel mock you, Prince Rellium, for how will you find these and identify these or fight against these, and they are a great multitude and spread out, and it is time you have gone to church and turned more to God. Now have you noticed, or asked, why are there seeming to be more angels about, and emerging out of places where they seemed as if prior concealed?

	Now it is extremely immature to be calling anyone an INCEL for being only a person, or a person who cares about justice, and INCEL is not an item of morality just because a gang has emerged with an absurd cause that should not exist, for they are in places, a fundamental thing to people, that we are all INCEL at times, that they are not an item of morality, but an absurd gang. Now a fool speaks this way, to add things not morality as if they were morality, and fools have partnered with this gang, INCEL, to divide the good against the good, promoting what is only part of every person, as if a person themselves, should be cut in pieces and divided against themselves, which is only a military level insult. Now remove the trash from out of your mouth, you who are trash, for there are serious matters of great weight against people, that the priest-hood of Japeth, that they call neo-Nazis, accommodates what already is, mentioned also in the Old Testament, and the INCEL disrupts society and cuts it in pieces, for it is a thing without reason or cause. Now the INCEL is presented to in reports to as if a gentle group who is for fundamental things of people, and yet they are not as they are portrayed, for they are a gang that is for abuse and keeping silent about real abuse, that they are the lowest slaves, slaves to the two groups of higher slaves, only above those who are in the lake of fire, and have not many INCEL even gone so low as the lake of fire, where there are slanderers and those who shed blood, who drink the wine of bloodshed? Now if there are responsible and controlled volcanoes who indulge in such in a harmless way, these volcanoes are not in the lake of fire, but they are having that which is in the lake of fire as well, and yet they are not evil people and there are Europeans and those of North America who are so. Now an INCEL rebels against the greatest of slave owners, and they rebel against themselves, being slaves of slaves, and yet some are not slaves of slaves, for they are servants of great people, and yet they rebel before there is any yoke offered to them, and the will of the Lord must be accomplished, that the slaves be enslaved or cast out of society, for it is a time of many slave uprisings before there is a yoke, for the yoke is spiritual and perceived by them. Now those who are for abuse, who are supporting abuse and defending it, and defending silence for real abuse, that those who speak out should be punished, or tortured, these are slaves of slaves, worse than the two higher shelves of Orgoth, the mountain in hell, and it is good that these are being killed, or enslaved, and given to their rightful slave owners, for if you commit error in this way, there will be yet more problems and evil. Now those servants of kings, in the house of kings, and rebelling because the Lord's will is not established on Earth, these are not as the slaves, but it is still a rebellion and their methods are wrong, for they should then be supporting the kings and not attacking them.

	Now were the wise fostering an angel during that time of the plague and even before? But is it not the wise who take to fostering angels? Now some are having the wisdom of angels, in the likeness of angels, and others are having the wisdom of people, Jews, and there are those liking the Jews and those liking the angels.

	Now Adonijeh is more like a minority gang, and if he and some others partner against kings, and if they encroach upon territory where there is not place even for vigilantism, that it is not their domain, that they commit wickedness that makes them a traitor, then it is understood that Solomon is the anointed king, and it is so, and it is a thing of the Lord, and Solomon is the people, the citizens, and David, the military, is the only thing higher, and yet there are things in society that are higher than all of this, and these I will not mention. Now there are all of the people of the devil and all of the people of God, and yet a sound woman, who can find? Now there are sound women, and yet the women who hates men hates against her own self, for she is a person and men are people, and some are born men and some women, and so she hates against herself, that she reasons foolishly and builds on ignorance, and it is a cosmic struggle that is build upon ignorance for she is against herself, and is it not also because of other women that she hates? Now if the root of it is some iniquity for her, than it is better that she had not done so, and let a woman save herself from becoming a slave among the people, an ignorant and brutal thing, a child from hell who is an adult.

	Now the woman who hates men because of abuse, but it is implied that I do not write concerning her, for she is a different case and different thing.

	Now I looked at women were exploiting the stories of other women when these stories did not apply to them, and they robbed the rightful heirs and slandered them, spiritually, that things might be more difficult for them, for it was as discord sowing against the rightful heirs of the stories, that they were the rightful victims who suffered and I thought, stand back from her who is the rightful heir. Now she will have her own things to go through and it is not good that she be robbed. Now then some order was sweater than injustice, and comfort, though good, did not make right as much as some order and justice, that it was being better to offer order and justice in most things rather than to offer comfort, though comfort too, was good, and both could be offered. Now those who offered comfort, but against truth, but there was a time and place for everything and common sense knew it.

	Now those the Lord defied, these were those saying, yet we are wicked the Lord judges wickedness as good as righteousness and they were not regarding that the Lord was with others and not with them, for they did not seem to regard that their wickedness was much wrong. Now were there not others the Lord defied who said, yet we control God, and yet they were made by God, and they were as unbelievers, who did not believe in Him.

	Now there is another thing, for others who believed or did not, some had died, and their spirit taken, and a spirit from Heaven taking the body, the spirit no longer there, but taken, and the spirit taking the body to investigate what had occurred that it was another person, a spirit of Heaven, in the same body, and there could be no adultery to this thing.




Now if Midianites had seized much control, and those of David were not able to help, for they were bound to their place, then I thought, it is not good that David is sent to fight himself. Now if any had emerged from the people, as if they had been hidden, to fight against the Midianites, yet it did not seem good that Adonijeh or David should be considering themselves traitors if they did not fight themselves in this thing, and yet there is great lawlessness when the Midianites, the con-artists and racketeers, are plentiful in the land, and the soldiers did not seem to do much or know much about it in their own nation, and yet some went to fight in other nations while their own people were attacked at home, in their own nation. Now the Midianites were in every institution, and they fought more cowardly than any in that cowardly war, and only Babylon was more cowardly than them, and the Midianites cared for money.

	Now as for Prime Minister Justin Truduea, it is a thing of religion that he is Abishag, and there is more about my apologies to him in The Diary of Lucifer that explain though it is acceptable for an angel to write such of him, as I was mostly against him because of the homelessness that occurred, yet others are not angels, and it is acceptable for the Lord to speak such of me, where he explains my embarrassment, and yet what the Lord says about me would be blasphemy for a person, and yet it is not so for the father who created me, and what I write about Prime Minister Trudeau might be wrong for another, and yet it is permissible for me. Now are any of you an angel? But in the role of Emporer there is much consideration given to domain and not exceeding it in matters of speech, for the Prime Minister is a Shogun, and the domain is very small in these matters, and yet free to be ignored in areas where it is free, that great consideration is given to the leader of the meeting place, the Prime Minister, in the role of Emporer, that meddling not occur and that proper consideration and respect for the office of Prime Minister is supported and upheld by the Emporer. Now more about this is written of in The Diary of Lucifer and it will come later, when all has been given to the public. Now the angel has said, of himself, my representative is the grand-daughter of the Christ, if she would have ever been, and it is not offence to the angel to think of this thing, and it is a thing of religion, for the angel has said even, I am the grand-daughter of the Christ. Now the angel is not troubled by this thing, and yet what is permissible for an angel to write and say about a Prime Minister is not what is acceptable for people, and moving towards the role of Emporer, then great consideration is found in a different role.

	Now I am of Zion and not of Jerusalem, and most of what I write is concerning Zion, and as for the Hebrew Jews, that are Jerusalem, these I have not offered much to in terms of correction or advice, for though the role of deacon of Earth has been fulfilled, yet the angel moves towards a greater concern for Eretz Chadrack, or Canada, or Salem, and he has been given what money they are able to give to anyone here, and yet alms he has not received, for the people have not known of him, and support by way of people he has not received either, for the people have not even heard of him, and what is wanted of him anyway? But as Emporer what is wanted is for him to do almost nothing, except to create art and write books, that he not meddle, and that none be tempted to blaspheme, and if this is to be right, and the people are worthy, yet he must receive alms of some type, otherwise he will be carrying out business, and it will be the fault of the people, if any should say, he should keep to his side of the wall, for to keep there, and it is not wrong that they would say such, he must have alms, for Soldiers live in one place and masons in another and there are the walls and it is good that these things are regarded and respected to some degree, for the consideration of all, and does the Emporer not understand this? But indeed he does, and yet it is not the Emporer's guilt if he is not able to keep this thing to a satisfactory degree if he is not receiving alms as people tithe in the churches and the churches continue and some are being blessed to give alms to the Emporer, that he be able to keep to what is good, that what is wanted of him by the people is to create art and write books of wisdom and to be considerate of the Shogun of the meeting place, the leader of the meeting place, and to be considerate of where he should not meddle in politics, unless it be by means of books, which are free to be ignored, as they are written by the Emporer who has no political power which is the power of Shoguns.




Now there were all the evil beasts from hell that terrorized areas and some with great areas and some with smaller, and some easily driven off, and some large, brutal, and relentless, and was it not good that the military should be handling some of the larger, more brutal beasts? But there were terridactos, and treacherous foreigners, those not being of the same people by citizenship of the world, and there were evil vultures that swooped down on the living and pecked, and there were scorpions that stung, and there were prostitutes of the enemy, the two types, and there were things that bludgeoned and bruised as harassment, and there were things driving away without explanations, and there was no easy cause to find, and people were going away, and there were slanderers being prolific and shameless in their many slanders and there were liars abounding in number, and this was not even fighting with arrows, that were considered swords in that time, and was it not a war zone in most ways, and yet arrows were not fired at people, and yet an area was terrorized as if in war, as if the people were a threat that must be scattered. Now there were those attempting to start riots, to start civil wars, to cause chaos and anarchy, and they were those of another nation who were to represent what should be considered the enemy to some, that these were false-flag tactics, and there were confident slanderers and criminal harassment and distractions, and what might aid the nation was considered a threat and what might disable the nation and destroy it was given support by the enemy. Now I looked, and indeed there were people who were attempting to cause chaos, and I thought, these must hate our nation for something our nation has done and yet they look like our citizens and some of them are. Now I did not blame any religion, but only blamed some foreign influence and power that was against our nation, and there was nothing to say to anyone, for they did not know me as Emperor, or angel, or anything more than a person. Now it seemed the most populous province, or I assumed so, was targeted the most by these attempts to stir up anarchy and chaos, and yet the people were too busy to begin rioting and to resort to anarchy, and I perceived, it is a desperate time for our nation.

	Now it was even a time as such, where 100 pedophiles would be arrested and the next day wicked fools, without explanation would be harassing a pretty boy, whether he had ever been a victim of anything or not, for it did not matter and he was considered the primary target to retaliate against, for the it was a time when people were carrying out wickedness against their own people as if everything was war and there was no such thing as crime, and these wars were added at random to the civil wars that had already been taking place.

	Now there is Judah, the people of action, and the house of David, the sons, being people of less action, it would seem, physically, as a way of describing it, and the angel is as if of the house of David. Now not all those with names who are found in the prophecies are those who are mentioned by it, for how could it be? Now many are having the same name, and even close to similar stories, and yet not all of the signs are there, and it is not fulfilled, that the amount of signs, or witnesses, are not present and it is not these that are written about. Now there are many tribes of David and different tribes of Judah, and these are types, and there is that which fulfills the prophecy and that which does not, and that which offers false signs and is not so, and so only leave them in peace, for it is only necessary that the rightful person is fulfilling. Now if there are those who use INCEL tactics, being perverse and wicked tactics, such that their hands should be cut off and them hung upside down over a pool of water, that they carry out perverted things in society and use INCEL tactics, still, so that there is no division or wrong, it is good that you are not calling any an INCEL who is not part of the gang of INCEL, and instead are saying, they are using INCEL tactics, meaning they are doing things that are outside societal bounds, that they should be stopped immediately. Now those doing so are perverted and wicked and there are those speaking of things with a perverted and wicked mouth, things that should not be spoken about and said. Now what is the manner of this speaking, but that a wicked pervert has said, allow me to be in bed with your child. Now this is wicked and perverse speaking, and it is the manner of the wicked and perverse speaking. Now because of their perversity, they are called sick, and yet they are perverted and wicked. Now do not say, I do what is done in religion by another, when you are not part of it, and have no part of it, and are not that person, for they will say, if you were that person you would have had a good opinion of me, for those not part of Zion are not any of these things, and they are given what they are, and some are part of Zion, and yet they are not entitled to what is for another, and this, too, is the deception and wickedness of the devil working. Now if God is not with you, but with another group of people, how will you claim any justice against them when you are not first considering that God is judge of all life. But has the Lord defied you? Now He has defied other people. Now put yourself not in a high place in the presence of the famous, or princes, or those who are well known, princes, but it is better that you are minding your own business or being indifferent to greeting in your wisdom, to be calm, that you are brought forth from this in your wisdom, for wise men have behaved so in their wisdom, and the heart rejoices in others to say, there is wisdom there with this person! Now if any is despising another type of prince, who is not a fool that they are not worthy of such honour, but are despised, for they are not even a son who causes shame, that they are a wicked fool and harsh in some way, then do not the wise judge fairly and rightly, that they despise this one, and they see them as a bitter thing before their eyes. Now use a careful ear, you who are not accustomed.

	Now the INCEL were for killing princes, the mighty, the strong, even what kings could be found, and they were for killing those who were good looking, that the INCEL are an enemy nation, and their nation is hell, and they are at war with your own country, to kill your mighty and great as enemy soldiers would do if they had come secretly into your country. Now such is not ideological in truth, for it is rather religious and political and it is cosmic war against a country that the devil wishes to destroy a country. Now those foreigners who enter the country who hate the country, they are without saying, not really citizens of our nation, and the same is the case for any who enter another country and hate that country. Now those who hate our people, that they seek to disable the efforts of our mighty, of our good-looking, those who are there even for our morel, these are indeed enemies to our country, for they fight for the enemies of our nation, that they are offended by what is a source of pride for our country, the beautiful person, or the greatly intelligent person, or the inventor of something, or another thing, and they seek to lessen these things, for they fight for the enemies of our nation, and are not only not citizens, but are enemies to our country and citizens with another nation. Now be offered the band, that you not partner with our enemies, you who would be tempted by wickedness and folly, and you not take compassion into the realm of wickedness and eradication of necessary and just truth, you who are blindly walking with compassion, but let order be established that you are able to be compassionate. Now if some are seeming more harsh, offering order, and other seeming better than them, offering compassion, yet those who offer order are often having compassion as well, and yet they know that it is kinder to offer order when order is lacking, that there might be order so that others may have compassion. Now all those with a good heart are on the same side, even if we may all step in wrong places and commit slight errors.

	Now there are the alienated, the outcast, not INCEL, and they have always been among us, and they are often the intelligent, and they are not supporting abuse as the INCEL or willing to join a terrorist gang, and this is well known and understood, that the way of Cain cease where it is found with strong simpletons, for all already know what is in society, and what is good, and there is no excuse to be found for the strong simpletons who have gone in the way of Cain, and David was not as these and neither are these Jews, but they are unjust and sycophantic and their simplicity and strength harbours wickedness. Now a decease of Cain seemed to have spread through the people during the plague and it was there prior, and the way of Cain was found with many more than it was usually to be found with, and Cain was sycophantic and murderous and the innocent were the Lord's that they, who harboured Cain, hated, that they condemned innocence and intentionally, being ugliness against beauty, sycophantic against the Lord's people, who were doing well. Now they judged, intentionally, being sycophantic, to judge what is not right to condemn. Now these were as murderous demons come up from hell, and it had the mark of a man, the number six-hundred and sixty six, and some of them had received the mark and yet they did not perceive that they had received it. Now as the abomination is to be attacking an angel with wickedness, so, likewise, was the abomination of attacking God's people, when they were doing well. Now was God not with the innocent, or would any who harboured Cain say, I kill that I might inherit? But as one kills a child, so is the mark of a man in the fashion six-hundred and sixty-six, the mark of the beast and the wickedness was also with other things that are considered likewise to this. Now the rebellion of such, and the sicophantry of such, that any should kill the innocence, to be sycophantic towards it, as one kills a child, so this rebellion is the mark of a man in the fashion six-hundred and sixty-six, the mark of the beast.	

	Now it was chosen that things should be explained more fully in some of these matters, that a fuller understanding might be had, and then there is the wisdom that a prostitute of the enemy, slaying the innocent with guile by means of seducing him that she might betray him and commit adultery, or the equivalent of adultery, this is indeed a thing of rebellion and sicophantry against the innocence of him, and the rebellion and the spirit of Cain that is in it, is being the number of a man, six-hundred and sixty-six, the mark of the beast, that the type of prostitute of the enemy who does this thing is receiving no hope any longer of salvation, and no hope to be entering Heaven, but whether she drinks of the wine of blood-shed in this thing, for it is possible in spirit, or she does not drink of it, yet it is a thing outside the bounds of humans.

	Now I considered, better then to be a prostitute of the enemy who is bullying and bludgeoning with harassment, though she is having the manners of a slave, almost, that at least there might be some hope for repentance for her, and she be purified to be clean of iniquity, for she is far better off than the other type of prostitute, and she has been more honest in their hatred, that her hatred is open before those who hear her. Now totally avenged is your brother, you women, who have hated the prostitute who has no hope of salvation, and she was a thing of a the military, of being a soldier for the devil, and the bullying and rude prostitute, yet she is owing repentance for her wrongs, that she has committed much iniquity.




Now if there are those who are the devil's, yet do not adjust your standard to their wickedness, for if hell is steps from the righteous, then how much fewer steps from the wicked, and there are those who have stepped into hell, and are they not among the people? But those taking the mark of a man, the number six-hundred and sixty-six, and all those who are the devil's, these are disbursed among the Earth, and I looked, at most of the atheists were not among them, and they were cold and the others hot, and the devil's were hot or cold in the ways of the devil, and the two kingdoms were upon Earth, the Lord's, and the devil's, and there was Zion, that the Emperor was part of, and the angel, and Jerusalem was attacked at the time this was being written, and the angel did not know what he was to do in the matter of Jerusalem, and many had already been killed. Now let it never be said that the angel did not have much sympathy for Jerusalem during this time, and that he did not wish them well. Now if nothing can be expected from the priest-hood of Japeth, yet the angel is Zion, and he only names the priest-hood of Japeth's descendants, and are they not expected to be against the Hebrew Jews by what they are? But they have their purpose, and the angel has his purpose.




Now those who compromised their understanding because of jealousy, that they should be yielding more to the beautiful and yet threw away their understanding intentionally, these were even being wicked and offensive, and yet there was the understanding of men, that by greater understanding, they were trust-worthy and being wise men of many concerns and cares, for who was like these men, who cared about many things with concern, being rare among the people, with much understanding and wisdom, and had not the devil sought to remove these and many good things, and right things, from places of greater influence, for in many ways it is still a bad time for the rightful heirs being given their rightful place, and these men were better, in my opinion than princes, and I have been a prince many times, and what came from them was as good waters and everything worthy was called a loser in that time, and what was so, was not called so, for the opposite seemed to be said, and the less worthy were not worth calling anything for the mouths of sociopaths were seeming to have broken free.

	Now there was no requirement for any INCEL gang, and all that was required was to be a man, or for those men to remain and for wisdom to be sought. Now a father was a made a king, when he bore a son who was a king, that when his son had brought fame and grand-children to him, and all of his wives, daughters in law, so then a father was given honour after his son had gone out and gone his separate way, that the son returned, having been a king. Now there have been perverse people meddling in the time of the angel, and they are naming offence to themselves, where there is no offence or anything of their concern, that they say, I have the right to retaliate, and yet they have no reason. Now because more people of the devil's, who did things outside the bounds of humans, were upon the Earth, the time was seeming exceedingly bad in some places, and those who remained to integrity were remaining, and those who were with the devil, having gone to him prior.

	Now by abilism, the right type, that is part of cognitive ability, the sociopaths are the things of the least worth or value, that if they are given any job among the people, yet they are not one of the people, and must yield to the people, for animals have swarmed to attack the person who was away from the city in the wilderness, and the animals said, he is not having as much defence, or he is sick. Now those who do not keep an animal from attacking people, if they wish to keep such animals, such sociopaths and employ them with jobs, these must be responsible for these animals, to keep them back from the people, the citizens, if it is the case that they can find no others to do a job but sociopaths. Now if any human is allowing such animals to attack people, and making no effort to protect the humans, this human is responsible for the actions of the sociopaths, that both beast and human are guilty. Now this is the moral standard of people, and not Egyptions.

	Now as for the economy of Eretz Chadrack, if corporations are fighting against the government and the people, which are the government, and saying, we should be protected, yet they attack the country where there are millions of people as a disabling force against the country, then they should not think they should be protected if the people send soldiers, for the people are king, and let not some other thing become king over them as if they are dealing with a foreign occupation, for if the people are sending soldiers against the corporations to seize the corporations to protect millions of lives, yet at such a level of economic warfare, there is reason for war. Now if corporations are disabling a nation, then it is reason for more drastic measures from the people if the corporations are fighting provisions of permissions to carry out business in a nation, such as forcing inflation to fight against a raise in the minimum wage, which is a breach of the trust that is only implied when corporations are permitted to do business in a nation where the lives of millions of citizens are considered. Now a wise business owner fears correctly in a way that is good, knowing that they play with great things, that they should not play as if a careless game, for millions of lives are the people, and they are the country. Now forcing inflation to retaliate against a raise in wages is a breach of trust and is a war against the people and their government, for the government is the people.




Now where there is extortion, racketeering, and military-like tactics employed against businesses, and where people take bribes, is it prudent to open an business in such a place? For will you not end up in prison somehow, as an innocent person, or find yourself in a mental hospital ward for your efforts to open a business in such an area? But if you will open a business in such an area, than you know that you may have a difficult time, unless you are gaining some blessing of protection that is from the Lord, carried out by men to be at peace with you, for the Lord can turn the hearts of men against you, and by the masses, and he can turn the hearts of men to be at peace with you, by the masses, and he can turn the hearts of men many ways, that they are blessed to be adhering to the will of God, that you fear God, and know that He is the Lord. Now still, it is not seeming prudent to be carelessly opening a business in an area where there is great crime and extortion and bribes taking place, where your business will be made bankrupt, or robbed, and to know an area before you move into it, is to know a vital thing to you, for I do not say this as a business person, but as one who considers and has seen.

	Now how will such places be restored to purity, that they might prosper, for there are cities, it seems, who are for the collection of all that has gone wrong, that they are as places of safety for the people to run to when things have gone wrong, and there are places where people with problems are running to, that there are too many of them and they will not be placed in prison, or brought to hospitals, and yet such places must still be governed and the soldiers of cities must still protect the people in these places. Now if these places have problems, will you not offer justice that the people are protected, and will you not petition the government that attention be given to these places, for they are as forgotten cities, lost, and yet they remain, and the people are not for being lost. Now it is then seeming good that some crime is not caught, for there are other crimes that the good escape from by this crime, such as when the government is filled up with criminals.




Now who is more right by abilism than me? For the height of everything is reached by me, and yet there is only cognitive ability, and such is an angel, and not part of your society, that abilism says, give up your life that he not be thirsty even a little, and even your family is worthless in comparison to him, and yet the Lord has made His angels, and they are sent from Heaven to dwell on Earth, and they are not your peers, or part of your society, and do not some of them come to aid you, those who come to aid you? For you rescue each other and have not angels rescued some of you? Now the angels are of mighty ability, more ability than kings, and these are the Lord's, and they are not your people, and only the most elite soldiers will be their friends, and those like Abraham, and the angels are favouring elite soldiers, mighty men. Now though they favour others, yet can any of you be companion to angels? Now some angels have lowered themselves, still being angels, for it is not Sufism, and as they are still angels, yet they have lowered themselves that they might be able to be married, and this has occurred prior.

	Now an animal is with too little intelligence to know the difference between men and women, and they feign being something else in moments, erratic and striving, jumping from place to place, and it is all wickedness and lies with which they do so, for they detach themselves from truth, from what they are, and it is from a family, a father and mother, who have no worth, and them no worth, and it attacks people, it being an animal, and it has even been foolish enough, this animal, to attack angels, receiving the number of the beast and having no further hope of attaining heaven. Now if the mother and father of it are punished because of it, receiving great punishment for having let such an animal loose, than what pity should any have for them? Now a extremely wealthy man has nothing, not enough, to pay an angel for the smallest offence, even if he empties all his wealth to him, for he is weighed to be worthless by any iniquity of his mouth, a piece of trash, worthy to be cast into the lake of fire. Now his head belongs to God, who made him, and the angel's are the Lord's, come to Earth to dwell, some of them, that they are knowing their domains, and what is permissible for them, is not permissible for people. Now what use does an angel have for abilism? But it is not making sense, for angels are not people, and all of you are small and insignificant, of little integrity, little worth, little intelligence, little ability, praising yourselves over each other with a concept like abilism. Now abilism is cognitive ability, and you are not intelligent enough to judge with abilism, for you have not been made able to use this concept, to weigh all, and judge all, and you bring forth a little understanding, a little in advancements, and some of you are rebellious, to blaspheme was is beyond your realm, for how do angels understand your concern with death? But can an angel come down to this level, to understand your burying of the dead, that the dead bury the dead? But some only go from life to life, that the transition takes place, and you mourn, and it is a thing of people, and yet an angel cannot understand it in the same way, unless it should be his wife that has transitioned, and in this he can understand, and is mourning as you. Now better is the one who minds their own business, who does not go up in the presence of a prince, and how much better the one who keeps respect for God concerning angels? But are you eager to receive the number of the beast that you no longer have hope of entering Heaven? Now you cannot divide the Lord against His angels in your wickedness that you believe to be crafty, neither you who are slaves, who blaspheme people.

	Now the animal daughter, if she was receiving the number of the beast, yet it was unknown if the parents, too, received the number, for what their guilt was is unknown and the nations would not allow them to obey God and do what was right concerning an animal that had been brought up in their house. Now some of the parents were also partnered in their son or daughter being an animal and did they not all, all three, receive the number of the beast when the son or daughter received the mark of the beast, for they supported the animal that had been brought up in their house. Now they mocked with the false-god they had over them, that did not regard truth, and their lord was the devil, and they said with their hearts, Egypt is lord over us, that we do not regard the truth of God, that is the only truth, and other foolish things are lord over us, that are ignorant and not regarding the truth, that is the truth of God. Now so they were in rebellion, and their hearts spoke rebellion, and there was no hope of Heaven for them anymore. Now these were animals of the devil's.




Now benefit of the doubt is part of cognitive ability, as is time and place and what you are doing, and where you are, and every aspect of three dimensional reality, the departure from which we give various names to of being unwell mentally, or sick. Now past occurrences probably having occurred is part of benefit of the doubt, and past occurrences causing temporary problems is part of cognitive ability, whereby we are aware that such is not being mentally unwell, or sick. Now being afraid because of past occurrences, is not being unwell, and being afraid because of circumstances that are not known to others, is part of benefit of the doubt. Now there are many other things included in standard cognitive ability and the departure from it is an indication of being mentally unwell, or sick, and if intentionally harassing, still mentally unwell, but far more severely. Now the time and place where something is said, is part of cognitive ability, and what a person is doing when it is said, is part of cognitive ability, and those who make excuses to be against others out of nothing, this is a departure from cognitive ability and indicates a person is mentally unwell, for they depart from cognitive ability and are against another for no reason, which would indicate they are angry about something else, or there is no reason.




Now Greeks are entering into cognitive impairments, and Zion is calling the Greeks stumbling blocks, for Zion is for using cognitive ability.




Now gentiles are not Greek nor are they philistines, but they are what they are, and some are Greeks and philistines. Now if any is being a Greek in the matter of wisdom, though, then they are like those who dwell in a place of pure truth, the inside of a star and in these places that which is melded with wrong might be broken apart and purified within the star that the wrong is removed from it.




Now what is called Jerusalem is not Zion, and Zion is mostly with another people who are not Hebrew Jews, and if it is with any Hebrew Jews, than I do not know, but Zion is mostly found in what is called 'the west' and yet it can be anywhere. Now an easy mistake was made, and there can be no such thing as anti-Zionist, for it is only anti-People, and who is in Zion is not for any to decide, for some are in Zion and did not know, and is not all of North America in Zion, most of them, especially the fair shade, and none are permitted to build it like an architect, but the Lord builds it part by part, if anything is to be built on land, and the angel has made Ijeshil in a like manner, in a place in Heaven. Now simply obey, and give tithes where it is right and owed, giving to the spiritual, to those of Mala, that signs and symbols are built as something is built in Mala, in spirit, that it is in Heaven as it is on Earth. For you cannot build anything that is not first so in Mala. Now I have considered, all the fair shade of 'the West' are part of Zion, and yet who is in Zion, or who not, is not for any person to decide, for Zion is the kingdom, and not the Hebrew Jews, that are Jerusalem, that a man died in Israel, being blameless, and He was the son of God, and so there is Zion.




Now with two things alone, the people are able to obey the Lord, with purity, and with keeping loyalty to the people, so that by these two things, as if two commandments for all the people, the people are able to be obedient. Now what need will any have if they are remembering these two things? But it is sound for men and women.




Some things are not a problem in reality, only a problem in theory, making the arguments of such irrelevant. Also the false choice is such, where something is not a problem in reality, and the false choice thinker is them who sometimes have a cognitive impairment.




Now as for the world, I have considered more anti-trust laws to free the internet, being a great place for free speech, even religion, that the addition of anti-trust laws allow for people to discuss what they would like so that free speech and business might be able to prosper and more money made for all, and so that religion might be able to commence freely, and atheism able to commence freely.




Now the problem is not more religion, but the problem is more activism that is not activism as we know it, taking place, and often a better understanding of religion creates an environment where ignorant actions are not to take place, for people are not ignorant of the religions they follow and ignorant in how religion takes place. Now it is most often the ignorant and foolish, who are not much in the way of of respecting the sacred, who are those who go out with ignorant zeal to sow discord between religion and turn people away from all religion, and some of these are not religious at all, but are against all religion, or against the religion they claim they adhere to, to utilize the false-flag tactic. Now a zealot who is religious, such as those described by Peter in the New Testament, or the many who are in the Old Testament, these are not ignorant people, but those who are more concerned with the sacred, with God, and mostly human decency, whether there is a belief in God or not, for one does not have to be religious to understand the decency, that what angers without religion, is an offence also, with religion, that people not use exaggerations in these things to describe. Now Eretz Chadrack is having many zealous people for justice, as being one of the people, and their cause is their brother or their sister, and it is even a thing of Zion, and yet the wicked participate against justice in retaliation, to mock, and do what is wicked and horrible, that the wicked fight in the cosmic struggle against what justice has taken place, and even against those who had no part in the doing of justice. Now then, it is simple, if you are a person who cares about justice, that you should not be over-zealous for justice, for you do not know all that occurs, and people lie to protect others and to protect themselves as they move through this world, that the quick to act, and over-zealous are a grievous burden, and these, though they care for justice, are best to know the limits of when to defend others, and how far to go, and when the lines have been crossed and things are open, for there is no wrong in a woman defending her brother in words, that it does not insult, as the wicked have told them, and yet be silent when it is right, for the women of Eretz Chadrack are as female warriors of the tribe that is the descendants of Japeth, and they are zealous, being holy, concerned for their brother, and yet they should be judging more by the standard of men, that the judgments of women are for women, and what is for men, is for men, for they are zealous, at times, and some act quickly.




Now will the women of the Elsnon not be receiving the one sided sword, the eldest daughter? But it is of the fair shaded women, that the eldest daughter is receiving the one sided sword, one edged, and the keys when she comes of age. Now what is honoured among the people, that of Zion, for the priest-hood and all the fair shade are Zion, should that which is honoured be disregarded by those few of the people who are not of Zion and rejecting it, that they prefer another way, and another people, their hearts with another thing that is not the people? Now the elected representatives do not decide what the people are, but the people decide who the elected representatives will be, and I have believed in democracy, that is good, for it is giving freedom of religion, freedom of speech, and it is a wall against lack of freedoms that should be taken for granted. Now where encroachments are made, it is a few who are not the people, like an occupation force of fools who would seize control with few people, and exploiting temporary circumstances to do so, for they encroach upon freedoms, and they have encroached upon the mountains, and the mountain people, whose ways and cultures are for keeping weapons for recreation and hunting, and they are also the core of our people and all groups of Japeth's descendants who are our people are required. Now I am also for Shem, that I am seeing his descendants as part of our people in what manner they are, and Shem and Japeth are seeming together for me, and yet the dark shade is mostly only honouring one group of Japeth's people, and it is not the most polite group, but it is a group known for honesty and rejecting foolishness, that it is a good group and there are kings among them, and yet the more spiritual groups, and the atheists, and that which is Zion, the dark shade are not seeming to acknowledge, and they are preferring that group that is also good, and a righteous group, that is indeed Zion, and yet as a separate group of Zion, and is not this group more irreverent, and yet they have respect with them. Now I considered, it sows discord between these two that the dark shade is mostly only acknowledging the one group of Japeth's descendants, and they are not really so separate, but only as another province of Zion, and there is no need for discord, that only the one group should be acknowledged. Now those of the dark shade who were left untouched by what the angel was against, the angel did not miss anything he was to be against, and so what was untouched was not meant to be touched, and the angel is not God, but the city is meant to be destroyed and the angel destroys, and the nation is to be brought down, and the angel obeys, and so pray to God, that His will be done, also, for justice is also good for you, that it saves the good and righteous.

	Now if I was ever a mountain, and yet if I ever housed a volcano, where is the sign of it on Earth, and what volcano am I? Now if I am Saturn, what is the meaning of the rings? But I have spent more time concerned for things besides myself, and in younger times I was foolish enough to have eaten money, to have consumed diamonds, and I thought, it is Babylon, and the money and the diamonds I consumed injured me, for these things are not edible, and even if nothing is forbidden, yet is it not implied that what cannot be food is not wise to be consuming? Now it was not Babylon, and I believed it was, and it was the injury of having consumed money and diamonds, and there are those rare women, precious stones of the wilderness, beautiful in the sunlight, and these are mentioned in The Diary of Lucifer that one of these, too, I consumed in spirit that it injured me. Now did I not know, it is not good? Yet it was a reckless time, and I consumed.

	Now if any is filled up with plantain, and it can happen, too, to those in North America, of the fair shade, yet it better that a diet should be balanced, for nothing is forbidden, and yet a balanced diet is good, and I have been filled up prior with the hidden manna. Now for those able to eat and drink, I would advice, drink not money and inedible things, for they injure, and I have done so, and for those being attacked, that they cannot control what they eat and drink, then the Lord knows all things, and of course you are not guilty of anything, and yet it should be known that the attackers do keep you from practising Christianity correctly. Now for those who drink cities, yet to take a city or a likewise thing is not the same as drinking what is inedible, for you are able to govern yourselves and I offer no more guidance in this thing. Now at what time did I eat money, coins, and diamonds? But I was as a child, a child angel, and all the women had departed, that I was left for some time after they had gone, and I thirsted and hungered, and so I ate and drank what is not edible.

	Now I speak of spiritual things of love, that there were those women who offered sustanance for the child angel, and the angel was as a child, innocent and harmless, eating and drinking of love and things that are good, not judging much, if at all, but feasting upon romantic love, that when the women had departed, the child was very sad, and there was a time for which he grew hungry and thirsty for the women had gone. Now was not one women a Christian, what I call a Sufi Christian, which is really a very Christian thing to be, for it is a Christian, and though the mountains and rocks might not be so, yet the mountains and rocks, and those who perform on land, these are also all Christians, that every type of Christian is required and all have their own strengths, advantages, and disadvantages, and I have rejected the letters of Paul, for I find much blasphemy in the letters of him, and he does not know what it would be assumed an apostle should know, or a leader of Israel, at least, for I find no advantage of circumcised Christians, circumcised in heart, or those who perform on land, and are not Sufi, for all have their advantages and disadvantages. Now some are having the Old and New Testament within them, and some are having it outside them, that they perform on land, and both are valid. Now the Christ was both, for He said, destroy this Temple and I will rebuilt it in three days, and He also performed miracles, as Elijah, and fulfilled on land. Now as for the woman who might have been a Sufi Christian, or Christian, yet because she was a child of angels it was not good to be taking the same type of sustenance from her, and yet when the women had departed, again the child angel hungered and thirsted, that he took sustenance from her in spirit. Now she was like a cloud, and it mixed with the Temple, and it was not good.




Now the Hebrew Jews I have not hated, only I know that because we have our own Jews and all the tribes, that there will be problems with them not being in Israel, to be with Jerusalem, and though it is not a thing that concerns me, yet I know that some of the people are wishing for them to be in Israel because we have all the tribes, and these are Zion, and the Hebrew Jews are Jerusalem. Now a Hebrew Jew cannot participate in the building of Zion, and nor can a Salem Jew, or Zion Jew, participate in the building of Israel or Jerusalem, for it is wickedness for a Hebrew Jew to participate in the building of Zion. Now if the Hebrew Jews are to remain with those of Zion, yet they must be acknowledging Zion, that it is the Lord's, for it is a great wickedness to say to another of the Lord's children, you are not legitimate, for they must, at least acknowledge that Zion, and Christians who are within it, too are the Lord's. Now what have the dark shade desired? But most of them have only desired segregation, for the fair shade has been like a passive-aggressive bully to them, attempting to be friends, and it is insulting and an offence to them, that most of the dark shade has desired segregation, that some of them have even bullied the fair shade away because of this, exchanging evil for good. Now those, the rest, who do not desire segregation, these are in one group and those who want segregation, these are in another group, and the Emperor knows it, and what is right for an Emperor in terms of what wives he might take, for he must do well by all the people, less they be offended, is not necessarily acceptable for others, citizens, who are desiring segregation. Now if any is in love, yet let them marry, and it not be blocked in any way, for though I acknowledge the priest-hood of Japeth's descendants, who they call neo-Nazis, because they have a place in Zion as the priest-hood of Japeth's descendants, yet I am not affiliated with them. Now are the dark shade, most, even offended by all that has been written about them by the angel, or as the Emperor, for most of them have been as if harassed by a stalker who is fair shade who is persistently trying to be their friend, and is it not welcomed by them, the segregation given by these books? But such is more respectful than what the non-segregationists do, who insult with passive aggressive ways, not intending to insult. Now if the military is desiring to have no segregation, to have all shades, yet it is well for the military, that in this place there will be no segregation, and greater respect is given to all where there is segregation among the citizens. Now if the dark shade is not even offended by what has been written in these books, for it is benificial for giving them relief from the passive-aggressive insults, that are good intentioned, of those of the fair shade who have pitied them, having been taught to pity them, which is part of the insult, and having had great sympathy for them, for they have been taught that this is good, then because the books relieve this, the books and proverbs, and long proverbs, being the act of giving segregation from this, to remove the insult that is good intentioned, then I have seen that for some, justice is more wanted, and truth, rather than compassion, and there is one group that is for sympathy and pity still, and those who do not desire segregation, and there is the other group that is of greater respect to others, perhaps, that desires for segregation, for it is those who are for greater respect and decency, that people not be insulted and abused, and that other abuse might cease. Now there was one compassionate, but incompetent, and those he would have compassion for, they hated him immediately, for they were wise enough to dislike it, for they desired segregation, and there was another they would call a 'jack-ass' and he was for respect and decency, and as a father he would not exasperate his children by smothering them, but neglect them in the right way, as a father should, that his children love and respect him, and was this not the same 'jack-ass' who would also understand segregation and the greater respect and decency of it? Now the 'jack-asses' were wise and with understanding, and there were those with compassion, yet by incompetence, they became abusive, and some of these were the great abusers of their children, and the great abusers in other places, for they were compassionate, yet they were incompetent. Now the harsher man, yet he was not harsh, and yet he may have seemed strict, but he was not abusive, and he was called a 'jack-ass' and I am a jack-ass, that I even preach some of the wisdom of a jack-ass. Now there were kind and loving fathers, yet they did not smother their children, and they respected decency.




Now INCEL was only anti-abilism in summary, and anyone foolish enough to join them would be a person with some great lacking from even the standard of people, that these were not able, not the fittest, but those the Universe, or God, had selected to have less by the natural, social happenings of things, for the INCEL were incompetent, and incompetent to handle those standard things of life, for they had the cognitive impairment, and were very against the most able, that they were making their attack against the country. Now intelligent by reputation, some of them, yet none of them could be intelligent, and the potential and abilities of the nation could have been far greater if these people had not already been acting out their envy in every place. Now these were anti-abilism and thereby incredibly selfish, being anti-social and immoral, to prefer nihilism, foolishness, for nihilism is the uncompleted morality, and atheist do not say in their hearts, there is no right and wrong, and neither do those of religion, and intelligence is easily completing morality, to believe in morality, even if doing wrong, for it morality is held and inescapable because of the intelligence of a person, that without a belief in God, yet intelligence completes morality. Now those with morality cannot escape it, and yet those who are lacking in some large way are able to believe in nihilism, that morality is not inescapable for them. Now do not be overly selfish, as the INCEL, to not care for the species, for the able to accomplish, for Cain killed Abel, without jest, and indeed much was lost because of it, for he partnered with the devil. Now the INCEL boast what is clearly false against truth and these are those with a cognitive impairment. Now it is good that you are killing the INCEL who are in their gangs or enslaving them, and they are slaves of slaves, rebellious in advance of the slave owners, or those fit to be slave owners.

	Now there is another elite squad in our nation, aside from the anti-terrorist group of the military, and it is the government of the day, if they are working together, for when they are not taking their cues from our people, respecting our people, giving loyalty to our people, they are able to be an elite army against citizens who are not bearing arms against them, and this is not the idea of democracy. Now the citizens vastly outnumber them, and they are not even one-tenth of one-percent, and yet they are able to go to war with our country, this elite squad, if democracy is in a type of corruption, where this squad is at war with us. This is an extreme and perilous circumstance and it is also the type that can instigate violent revolt, and outbreaks of revolt, for the government must be the government of all the people, and not an army squad against some of our citizens. Solomon is king, and I am also Solomon, and so are others. David is the higher king, and he has left the nation to Solomon. Now those I call the mountain tribes, who brandish weapons often and are often living in rural areas, these are not the Terum written about earlier, but they are a people of the mountains, and the mountains are surviving all floods and the purges of such floods, that there is a time when much is purged and the good are being purged with the wicked, and it is as a war taking place, for it is a microcosmic civil war, and such can take place, where pockets of civil war take place and no person should assume it is the government employees who are not the criminals. Now the government groups are not gangs, and they have no ideology unless they become terrorist organizations, for their loyalty must be to society.

	Now the respect of society is an essential thing, for respect of persons is to view a neighbour close by to be something to rebel against, as if a king, and yet respect of society gives due respect and honour to those in society who are worthy of honour and the respect of society is keeping even politeness where it is due, that one has lacked respect of society, and the one who defends them lacks respect of society, and there are then others who do not respect society, and soldiers must come and slay many. Now respect of the written word, freedom of speech, is part of respect of society, and there are all the things that are worthy of respect in society, for the well-known princes are among you, that they are well-known, or celebrities to be famous or a little famous, and yet a king is having to remove himself much from society, for his greatness is too great, and a wicked man must be humble, for society is stronger and bigger than them, that soldiers of different types are there. Now where it is not so, then there is little government of the people, and the kings in crime are having responsibilities of righteousness to be good for the people. Now what does respecting society also mean? But it means that nothing is changed by writing of respect of society, for people are already knowing what respecting society is, that things only change for those who receive a rebuke, or a reminder, of what is more consistently beyond limits, so that the term does not interfere with sociology and what is right and wrong, but the term serves as a reminder of what is actually far out of the bounds of societal norms, as described by social and anti-social behaviour, that where there is respect of society there is the essence of politeness and yet politeness is the product where politeness is required and not the key thing. Now in summary, should you not give honour where it is due, respect of personal space and what is your business? Should you contend with any if they have done you no wrong, or offer them disrespect, when they have done you no wrong? But it is easy to know what respect of society means and what is then social and anti-social behaviour. Now those who misuse the term, do not respect society, and they mock with injustice.







[Currently this book is finished and will be included in the Beta launch prior to the official launch when the editing of The Diary of Lucifer, Notes from Salem and The Other World have been edited. Attempts to raise funds and acquire help for the launch and the non-profit organization based upon the desire to proliferate these books globally, will be carried out during the beta period prior to the official launch. As such none of the books have been edited and there are repetitions due to the amount of content that was produced in a half year period and is too much to process in a short period of time without aid from volunteers who are wanted to help with the project. The owner of these books, Nathan Unsworth, is not affiliated with any organization whether legal or illegal.]

















